nursery/apertium-udm-rus/apertium-udm-rus.udm.lexc
LEXICON GLAGOL-UG  ! отрицательные формы

%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:уг # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:уд # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:уз # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ум # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:уд # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:уз # ; 

%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ӧй # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ӧд # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ӧз # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ӧм # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ӧд # ; 
%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:ӧз # ; 

!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:уг # ; 
!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:уд # ; 
!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:уз # ; 
!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ум # ; 
!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:уд # ; 
!%<v%>%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:уз # ; 

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;


LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON POST-INDECL 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NUMBER ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NUMBER ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NUMBER ;


LEXICON NP-TOP-Я

%<np%>%<top%>: NUMBER ;

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<pred%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}сь # ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>гес # ; 

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: NUMBER ; 

LEXICON N1-KORKA

%<n%>: NUMBER ; 
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>н # ;

LEXICON N2

%<n%>: NUMBER-2 ; 



LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: NUMBER ;


LEXICON Poslelogy

аpтэ POST-INDECL ; 
беpе POST-INDECL ; 
быдэ POST-INDECL ; 
валче POST-INDECL ; 
дыpъя POST-INDECL ; 
кyзя POST-INDECL ; 
сямен POST-INDECL ; 
сяpысь POST-INDECL ; 
ӵоже POST-INDECL ; 
ӵош POST-INDECL ; 

дор POST-DECL ;
кузя POST-INDECL ;
котыр POST-INDECL ;

LEXICON Sojuzy
 
но CC ;  ! "и"
оло CC ;  ! "или"
нош CC ;  ! "а"
ден CS ; ! ""
куке CS ; ! "когда"

LEXICON Mestomenija 

кин PRON-ITG-KIN ; ! "кто"
ма: PRON-ITG-MA ;  ! "что"

мон PRON-PERS-P1-SG ; 
тон PRON-PERS-P2-SG ; 
со PRON-PERS-P3-SG ; 
ми PRON-PERS-P1-PL ; 
тӥ PRON-PERS-P2-PL ; 
соос PRON-PERS-P3-PL ; 

та PRON-DEM-TA ; 
номыр PRON-IND ; 

LEXICON Determinant

та DET-DEM-TA ; 

LEXICON Chisla

кык NUM ;
вить NUM ;
куать NUM ;
сюрс NUM ;
дас NUM ;
витьтон NUM ;

LEXICON Narechija

а%<qst%>:а # ;
шат%<qst%>:шат # ;

кытын ADV-ITG ; ! "где" 
куке ADV-ITG ; ! "когда" 
али ADV ; ! ""
туж ADV ; ! ""
шудо ADV ; ! ""
туннэ ADV ; ! ""
шуныт ADV ; ! ""
котьку ADV ; ! ""
ноку ADV ; ! ""
толон ADV ; ! ""
ни ADV ; ! "ещё / уже"
гинэ ADV ; ! "только"

ик ADV ; ! ""
озьы ADV ; ! ""
нокытын ADV ; ! ""
собере ADV ; ! "затем"
ӝог ADV ; ! "быстро"

ог ADV ; ! "около"

LEXICON Soobstvennoe

Россия:Росси NP-TOP-Я ; 
Удмуртия:Удмурти NP-TOP-Я ; 
Турция:Турци NP-TOP-Я ; 
Чувашия:Чуваши NP-TOP-Я ; 
Сирия:Сири NP-TOP-Я ; 
Башкирия:Башкири NP-TOP-Я ; 

Татарстан:Татарстан NP-TOP ; 
Москва:Москва NP-TOP ; 

Маша NP-ANT-F ;
Ваня NP-ANT-M ;

LEXICON Glagoly

уг: GLAGOL-UG ;
вань: GLAGOL-VAN ; 

сиыны:си GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "есть"
луыны:лу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "быть"
тодыны:тод GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "знать"
!кыpӟаны:кыpӟа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "петь"
шудыны:шуд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "играть"
адӟыны:адӟ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "видеть"
шуыны:шу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сказать"
шедьтыны:шедьт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "найти"
учкыны:учк GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "смотреть"
улыны:ул GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "жить"
кылыны:кыл GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "услышать"
кылӥськыны:кылӥськ GLAGOL-1-IV ;! "слышаться"
карыны:кар GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "делать"
быгатыны:быгат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "мочь"
яратыны:ярат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "любить"
юыны:ю GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "пить"
юаны:юа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "спросить"
утчаны:утч GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "искать"
утчаськыны:утчаськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разыскивать"
тыршыны:тырш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "стараться"
серекъяны:серекъя GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "смеяться"
пытсаны:пытса GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "закрыть"
пырыны:пыр GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "заходить"
пукыны:пук GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сидеть"
мыняны:мыня GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "улыбаться"
малпаны:малпа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "думать"
лыктыны:лыкт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "приходить"
лыдъяськыны:лыдъяськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "считать"
кылзӥськыны:кылзӥськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "вслушиваться"
кельшыны:кельш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "нравиться"
изьыны:изь GLAGOL-2-IV ; ! "спать" 
дугдыны:дугд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "остановиться"
вуыны:ву GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "прибыть"
вераськыны:вераськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разговаривать"
вераны:вер GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "говорить"
ватскыны:ватск GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "спрятаться"
вамышъяны:вамышъ GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "шагать"
бызьыны:бызь GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "бегать"
кылдыны:кылд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "строить, возникнуть"
дышетыны:дышет GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! 
дышетскыны:дышетск GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! 
серекъяны:серекъя GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "смеяться"
малпаны:малпа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "мечтать"
чупаны:чупа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "целовать"

LEXICON Prilagatelnoe

чебер A1 ; ! ""
шуныт A1 ; ! ""
кезьыт A1 ; ! ""
пичи A1 ; ! ""
бадӟым A1 ; ! ""
вуж A1 ; ! ""
матэ A1 ; ! ""
умой A1 ; ! ""
удмурт A1 ; ! ""
кун A1 ; ! ""
шудо A1 ; ! ""
визьтэм A1 ; ! ""

LEXICON Punktuacija

.%<sent%>:. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
!%"%<sent%>:%" # ;

LEXICON Nouns
адями N1 ; ! ""
анай N1 ; ! "мама"
ар N1 ; ! ""
атай N1 ; ! "father"
аудитория N1 ; ! "lecture hall"
бакча N1 ; ! "garden"
бусы N1 ; ! "field"
валэктон N1 ; ! "ответ"
ву N1 ; ! "вода"
гурт N1 ; ! "village"
дышетскись N1 ; ! "student"
история N1 ; ! "history"
йыр N1 ; ! "голова"
кар N1 ; ! "nest; city"
ки N1 ; ! "рука"
комиссия N1 ; ! "committee"
комната N1 ; ! "room"
корка N1-KORKA ; ! "дом"
котыр N1 ; ! ""
коӵыш N1 ; ! "кошка"
куазь N1 ; ! "погода"
куара N1 ; ! "звук"
кышно N1 ; ! "wife; woman"
нылаш N1 ; ! "девочка"
нылпи N1 ; ! ""
нюлэс N1 ; ! "forest"
пинал N1 ; ! "ребёнок"
писпу N1 ; ! "дерево"
пияш N1 ; ! "мальчик"
пукон N1 ; ! "стул"
пуны N1 ; ! "собака"
пӧйшур N1 ; ! "животное"
радио N1 ; ! "radio"
редакция N1 ; ! "editorial staff"
сад N1 ; ! "сад"
син N1 ; ! "глаз"
собрание N1 ; ! "meeting"
студент N1 ; ! "student"
сузэр N1 ; ! ""
телевизор N1 ; ! "television"
турын N1 ; ! "grass"
ты N1 ; ! "lake; lungs"
тылобурдо N1 ; ! "птица"
укно N1 ; ! "окно"
улон N1 ; ! "life"
университет N1 ; ! "university"
урам N1 ; ! "улица"
философия N1 ; ! "philosophy"
филология N1 ; ! ""
шудон N1 ; ! "игра"
юан N1 ; ! "вопрос"
ӝӧк N1 ; ! "стол"
программа N1 ; ! "программа"
правило N1 ; ! "правило"
школа N1 ; ! "школа"
вариант N1 ; ! "вариант"
система N1 ; ! "система"
правописание N1 ; ! "правописание"
проект N1 ; ! "проект"
кун N1 ; ! "страна"
кыл N1 ; ! "язык"
кылбур N1 ; ! "стих"
институт N1 ; ! "институт"
литература N1 ; ! "литература"
факультет N1 ; !
мугор N2 ; ! "тело"
зарни N1 ; ! "золото"
шунды N1 ; ! "солнце"
пушка N1 ; ! ""
